apertium-en-pl/apertium-en-pl.pl.dix.xml
    <pardef n="złodzie/j__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>j</l>
          <r>j<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ja</l>
          <r>j<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jowi</l>
          <r>j<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ja</l>
          <r>j<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jem</l>
          <r>j<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="inst"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ju</l>
          <r>j<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="locc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ju</l>
          <r>j<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="voc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>je</l>
          <r>j<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="nom"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>j<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jom</l>
          <r>j<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="dat"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>j<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jami</l>
          <r>j<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="inst"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jach</l>
          <r>j<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="locc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>je</l>
          <r>j<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kowal/__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>owi</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>em</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="inst"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="locc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="voc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="nom"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="dat"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ami</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="inst"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ach</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="locc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="hyc/el__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lowi</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lem</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="inst"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lu</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="locc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lu</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="voc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="nom"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="nom"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>li</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lom</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="dat"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>li</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lami</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="inst"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lach</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="locc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="goś/ć__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ć</l>
          <r>ć<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cia</l>
          <r>ć<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ciowi</l>
          <r>ć<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cia</l>
          <r>ć<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ciem</l>
          <r>ć<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="inst"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ciu</l>
          <r>ć<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="locc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ciu</l>
          <r>ć<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="voc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cie</l>
          <r>ć<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="nom"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ci</l>
          <r>ć<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ciom</l>
          <r>ć<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="dat"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ci</l>
          <r>ć<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ćmi</l>
          <r>ć<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="inst"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ciach</l>
          <r>ć<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="locc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cie</l>
          <r>ć<s n="n"/><s n="m1"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="złodziej"><i>złodzie</i><par n="złodzie/j__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kowal"><i>kowal</i><par n="kowal/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hycel"><i>hyc</i><par n="hyc/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gość"><i>goś</i><par n="goś/ć__n"/></e>
